Wisconsin, session 2025, AB758.
do enact as follows:AB758,13Section 1. 77.52 (13) of the statutes is amended to read:AB758,2,10477.52 (13) For the purpose of the proper administration of this section and to 5prevent evasion of the sales tax it shall be presumed that all receipts are subject to 1the tax until the contrary is established. The burden of proving that a sale of 2tangible personal property, or items, property, or goods under sub. (1) (b), (c), or (d), 3or services is not a taxable sale at retail is upon the person who makes the sale 4unless that person takes from the purchaser an electronic or a paper certificate, in 5a manner prescribed by the department, to the effect that the property, item, good, 6or service is purchased for resale or is otherwise exempt, except that no certificate is 7required for the sale of tangible personal property, or items, property, or goods 8under sub. (1) (b), (c), or (d), or services that are exempt under s. 77.54 (5) (a) 3., (7), 9(7m), (8), (10), (11), (14), (15), (17), (20n), (21), (22b), (31), (32), (35), (36), (37), (42), 10(44), (45), (46), (51), (52), (64), (66), (67), (71), and (72), and (74).AB758,211Section 2. 77.53 (10) of the statutes is amended to read:AB758,3,21277.53 (10) For the purpose of the proper administration of this section and to 13prevent evasion of the use tax and the duty to collect the use tax, it is presumed 14that tangible personal property, or items, property, or goods under s. 77.52 (1) (b), 15(c), or (d), or taxable services sold by any person for delivery in this state is sold for 16storage, use, or other consumption in this state until the contrary is established. 17The burden of proving the contrary is upon the person who makes the sale unless 18that person takes from the purchaser an electronic or paper certificate, in a manner 19prescribed by the department, to the effect that the property, or items, property, or 20goods under s. 77.52 (1) (b), (c), or (d), or taxable service is purchased for resale, or 21otherwise exempt from the tax, except that no certificate is required for the sale of 22tangible personal property, or items, property, or goods under s. 77.52 (1) (b), (c), or 23(d), or services that are exempt under s. 77.54 (7), (7m), (8), (10), (11), (14), (15), (17), 1(20n), (21), (22b), (31), (32), (35), (36), (37), (42), (44), (45), (46), (51), (52), (64), (66), 2(67), (71), and (72), and (74).AB758,3,33